Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB70.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 186.4102 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (10)[(9)] of this section, the Transportation
Cabinet shall issue operator's licenses and personal identification cards bearing a
photograph of the applicant and other information the cabinet may deem
appropriate to qualified applicants under this chapter. When taking the photograph,
the applicant shall be prohibited from wearing sunglasses, veils, scarves, or any
other attire that obscures or creates shadows upon any features of the applicant's
face as determined by the cabinet. An applicant shall be required to remove
eyewear that obstructs the iris or the pupil of the eyes and shall not take any action
to obstruct a photograph of his or her facial features. The face shall be visible from
the crown to the base of the chin and from ear to ear. Any person who refuses to
remove attire prohibited by this subsection as directed by the person taking the
application shall be prohibited from receiving an operator's license or personal
identification card.
(2) An operator's license or personal identification card issued by the cabinet shall not
contain the applicant's Social Security number. The cabinet shall promulgate
administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A that develop a
numbering system that uses an identification system other than Social Security
numbers. If an applicant submits adequate proof that he or she does not have a
Social Security number, the Transportation Cabinet shall assign the applicant a
unique identifying number.
(3) The license or personal identification card shall also designate by color coding and
using the phrase "under 21" if the licensee or card holder is under the age of twenty-
one (21); "CDL" if the license is issued pursuant to KRS Chapter 281A; or "under
21 CDL" if the licensee holds a commercial driver's license issued pursuant to KRS
Page 1 of 10
XXXX 12/18/2025 9:57 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1351
Chapter 281A and is under the age of twenty-one (21).
(4) The cabinet shall provide on each operator's license and personal identification card
space for a notation that the holder of the license or personal identification card has
expressed to the cabinet the person's willingness to make an anatomical gift under
KRS 311.1917. If a person who has made a declaration under this subsection
wishes to rescind that declaration, the person shall notify the Kentucky Circuit
Court Clerks' Trust for Life, which shall remove the notation from his or her
records.
(5) An operator's license issued pursuant to this chapter shall be designated a Class D
license.
(6) A person shall not have more than one (1) operator's license.
(7) Upon marriage, dissolution of marriage, or any other qualifying event, if a person
seeks to change his or her name, the person shall make a name change with the
Social Security Administration prior to applying for an operator's license or a
personal identification card and shall provide the cabinet with the person's marriage
license, divorce decree, or other documentation. The name issued on the identity
document shall match the person's first and last name as recorded with the Social
Security Administration. Unless a person is eligible to renew his or her identity
document at the time of the name change, the fee charged under this section shall be
for a corrected identity document as set forth in KRS 186.531.
(8) An identity document issued under this chapter shall contain a denotation that
either:
(a) The identity document is a voluntary travel ID identity document that
complies with the security standards set forth by Pub. L. No. 109-13, Title II,
and may be used for identification for federal purposes; or
(b) The identity document shall not be used for federal identification purposes.
(9) On or after January 1, 2027, every new and renewal identity document issued
Page 2 of 10
XXXX 12/18/2025 9:57 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1351
under this chapter shall contain a denotation identifying the status of the person
to whom the document was issued as:
(a) A citizen of the United States; or
(b) A noncitizen authorized to be in the United States.
(10) (a) The Transportation Cabinet may provide for the issuance of an instruction
permit, operator's license, or personal identification card without a photograph
if there is good cause for the omission based in documented religious
objections. The Transportation Cabinet shall promulgate administrative
regulations pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A to establish the criteria and
requirements for obtaining an operator's license, instruction permit, or
personal identification card without a photograph.
(b) An applicant for an initial instruction permit, operator's license, or personal
identification card without a photograph shall apply to the Transportation
Cabinet in Frankfort or a Transportation Cabinet field office. The application
shall be processed solely by the Transportation Cabinet in the same manner as
in KRS 186.4121(5) and 186.4123(8).
(c) An operator's license, instruction permit, or personal identification card issued
without a photograph shall denote on its face that it shall not be accepted by
any federal agency for identification or any other federal purpose.
Section 2. KRS 281A.170 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The commercial driver's license shall be marked "commercial driver's license" and
"CDL" and shall be, to the maximum extent practicable, tamper proof. It shall
include but is not limited to the following information:
(a) The name and present resident address of the licensee;
(b) The licensee's photograph;
(c) A physical description of the licensee including sex, height, weight, and eye
color;
Page 3 of 10
XXXX 12/18/2025 9:57 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1351
(d) The licensee's date of birth;
(e) The licensee's signature;
(f) The class or type of commercial motor vehicle or vehicles that the person is
authorized to drive together with any endorsements or restrictions;
(g) The name of this state;
(h) The dates between which the license is valid; and
(i) Any other information required by the cabinet, except for a person's Social
Security number.
(2) A commercial driver's license issued under this chapter shall contain a denotation
that either:
(a) The commercial driver's license is a voluntary travel ID identity document
that complies with the security standards set forth by Pub. L. No. 109-13,
Title II, and may be used for identification for federal purposes; or
(b) The commercial driver's license shall not be used for federal identification
purposes.
(3) On or after January 1, 2027, every new and renewal commercial driver's license
issued under this chapter shall contain a denotation identifying the status of the
person to whom the license was issued as:
(a) A citizen of the United States; or
(b) A noncitizen authorized to be in the United States.
(4) A commercial driver's license shall be issued with classifications, endorsements,
and restrictions. Vehicles that require an endorsement shall not be driven unless the
proper endorsement appears on the license and the applicant has passed the
knowledge and skills test required by the State Police.
(a) Classifications:
1. Class A - Any combination of vehicles with a gross vehicle weight
rating of twenty-six thousand and one (26,001) pounds or more, if the
Page 4 of 10
XXXX 12/18/2025 9:57 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1351
gross vehicle weight rating of the vehicle being towed is in excess of ten
thousand (10,000) pounds. Licensees with an "A" classification may
with the proper endorsement drive Class B and C vehicles;
2. Class B - Any single vehicle with a gross vehicle weight rating of
twenty-six thousand and one (26,001) pounds or more, and any vehicle
towing a vehicle not in excess of ten thousand (10,000) pounds gross
vehicle weight rating. Licensees with a "B" classification may with the
proper endorsements drive Class C vehicles;
3. Class C - Any single vehicle with a gross vehicle weight rating of less
than twenty-six thousand and one (26,001) pounds or any vehicle
towing a vehicle with a gross vehicle weight rating not in excess of ten
thousand (10,000) pounds which includes:
a. Vehicles designed to transport sixteen (16) or more passengers,
including the driver; or
b. Vehicles used in the transportation of hazardous materials which
requires the vehicle to be placarded under 49 C.F.R. secs. 172.500
to 172.560, as adopted by administrative regulations of the
cabinet, pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A;
4. Class D - All other vehicles not listed in any other class, including
mopeds; and
5. Class M - Motorcycles. Licensees with a "M" classification may also
drive mopeds.
(b) Endorsements:
1. "H" - Authorizes the driver to operate a vehicle transporting hazardous
materials;
2. "T" - Authorizes operation of double trailers and triple trailers in those
jurisdictions allowing the operation of triple trailers;
Page 5 of 10
XXXX 12/18/2025 9:57 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1351
3. "P" - Authorizes operation of vehicles carrying passengers;
4. "N" - Authorizes operation of tank vehicles;
5. "X" - Authorizes operation of combination of hazardous materials and
tank vehicle endorsements;
6. "R" - Authorizes operation of all other endorsements not otherwise
specified; and
7. "S" - Authorizes operation of school buses.
(c) The Transportation Cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations in
accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to outline restrictions on the operation of
commercial vehicles and the associated codes to identify such restrictions,
which shall appear on the face of the commercial driver's license.
(5)[(4)] Within ten (10) days after issuing a commercial driver's license, the cabinet
shall notify the commercial driver's license information system of that fact,
providing all information required to ensure identification of the person.
(6)[(5)] A commercial driver's license issued to a resident pursuant to this chapter
shall expire in eight (8) years unless the license was issued to a resident under the
age of twenty-one (21).
(7)[(6)] A person under the age of twenty-one (21):
(a) Shall not be:
1. Licensed to operate a Class A, B, or C vehicle unless he or she has a "K"
restriction; or
2. Allowed to operate a school bus; and
(b) Who holds a valid CDL may be issued a hazardous materials endorsement to
transport hazardous materials in intrastate commerce.
(8)[(7)] A commercial driver with a "K" restriction shall not drive a commercial motor
vehicle in interstate commerce, unless he or she is exempt pursuant to 49 C.F.R.
sec. 391.2.
Page 6 of 10
XXXX 12/18/2025 9:57 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1351
(9)[(8)] The holder of a commercial driver's license shall be considered to hold a valid
Kentucky driver's license issued under the provisions of KRS 186.4102 and
186.412.
Section 3. KRS 186.531 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "GF" means the general fund;
(b) "IP" means instruction permit;
(c) "License Fund" or "LF" means the KYTC photo license account created in
KRS 174.056;
(d) "MC" means motorcycle;
(e) "MC Fund" or "MCF" means the motorcycle safety education program fund
established in KRS 176.5065;
(f) "OL" means operator's license; and
(g) "PIDC" means personal identification card.
(2) The fees imposed for voluntary travel ID operator's licenses, instruction permits,
and personal identification cards shall be as follows. The fees received shall be
distributed as shown in the table. The fees shown, unless otherwise noted, are for an
eight (8) year period:
Card Type Fee LF GF MCF
OL (initial/renewal) $48 $48 $0 $0
OL (Under 21) (Up to 4 years) $18 $18 $0 $0
Any OL, MC, or combination
(duplicate/corrected) $15 $13.25 $1.75 $0
Motor vehicle IP (3 years) $18 $16 $2 $0
Motorcycle IP (1 year) $18 $13 $1 $4
Motorcycle OL (initial/renewal) $48 $38 $0 $10
Combination vehicle/MC OL
Page 7 of 10
XXXX 12/18/2025 9:57 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1351
(initial/renewal) $58 $48 $0 $10
PIDC (initial/renewal) $28 $25 $3 $0
PIDC (duplicate/corrected) $15 $13.50 $1.50 $0
(3) Except as provided in subsection (10) of this section, the fees imposed for standard
operator's licenses, instruction permits, and personal identification cards shall be as
follows and, unless otherwise noted, are for an eight (8) year period:
Card Type Fee LF GF MCF
OL (initial/renewal) $43 $43 $0 $0
OL (Under 21) (Up to 4 years) $15 $15 $0 $0
Any OL, MC, or combination
(duplicate/corrected) $15 $13.25 $1.75 $0
Motor vehicle IP (3 years) $15 $13 $2 $0
Motorcycle IP (1 year) $15 $10 $1 $4
Motorcycle OL (initial/renewal) $43 $33 $0 $10
Combination vehicle/MC OL
(initial/renewal) $53 $43 $0 $10
PIDC (initial/renewal) $23 $20 $3 $0
PIDC (duplicate/corrected) $15 $13.50 $1.50 $0
PIDC (no fixed address) under
KRS 186.4122(5)/186.4123(5)
(initial, duplicate, or corrected) $0 $0 $0 $0
(4) The fee for a four (4) year original or renewal license issued pursuant to KRS
186.4101 shall be fifty percent (50%) of the amount shown in subsections (2) and
(3) of this section. The distribution of fees shown in subsections (2) and (3) of this
section shall also be reduced by fifty percent (50%) for licenses that are issued for
four (4) years.
(5) Any fee for any identity document applied for using alternative technology under
Page 8 of 10
XXXX 12/18/2025 9:57 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1351
KRS 186.410 and 186.4122 shall be distributed in the same manner as a document
applied for in person with the cabinet.
(6) (a) An applicant for an original or renewal operator's license, permit, commercial
driver's license, motorcycle operator's license, or personal identification card
shall be requested by the cabinet to make a donation to promote an organ
donor program.
(b) The donation under this subsection shall be added to the regular fee for an
original or renewal motor vehicle operator's license, permit, commercial
driver's license, motorcycle operator's license, or personal identification card.
One (1) donation may be made per issuance or renewal of a license or any
combination thereof.
(c) The fee shall be paid to the cabinet and shall be forwarded by the cabinet on a
monthly basis to the Kentucky Circuit Court Clerks' Trust for Life, and such
moneys are hereby appropriated to be used exclusively for the purpose of
promoting an organ donor program. A donation under this subsection shall be
voluntary and may be refused by the applicant at the time of issuance or
renewal.
(7) In addition to the fees outlined in this section, the following individuals, upon
application for an initial or renewal operator's license, instruction permit, or
personal identification card, shall pay an additional application fee of thirty dollars
($30), which shall be deposited in the photo license account:
(a) An applicant who is not a United States citizen or permanent resident and who
applies under KRS 186.4121 or 186.4123; or
(b) An applicant who is applying for an[a] instruction permit, operator's license,
or personal identification card without a photo under KRS 186.4102(10)[(9)].
(8) (a) Except for individuals exempted under paragraph (c) of this subsection, an
applicant for relicensing after revocation or suspension shall pay a
Page 9 of 10
XXXX 12/18/2025 9:57 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1351
reinstatement fee of forty dollars ($40).
(b) The reinstatement fee under this subsection shall be distributed by the State
Treasurer as follows:
1. Thirty-five dollars ($35) shall be deposited into the photo license
account; and
2. Five dollars ($5) shall be deposited into a trust and agency fund to be
used in defraying the costs and expenses of administering a driver
improvement program for problem drivers.
(c) This subsection shall not apply to:
1. Any person whose license was suspended for failure to meet the
conditions set out in KRS 186.411 when, within one (1) year of
suspension, the driving privileges of the individual are reinstated; or
2. A student who has had his or her license revoked pursuant to KRS
159.051.
(9) As payment for any fee identified in this section, the cabinet:
(a) Shall accept cash and personal checks;
(b) May accept other methods of payment in accordance with KRS 45.345; and
(c) May enter into billing agreements with homeless shelters, health care
facilities, or social service agencies that serve individuals without an
established and fixed nighttime residence of regular return.
(10) There shall be no fee assessed for the initial, renewal, or duplicate standard personal
identification card to an individual, if the individual:
(a) Does not possess a valid operator's license or a commercial driver's license;
and
(b) Is at least eighteen (18) years of age on or before the next regular election.
Page 10 of 10
XXXX 12/18/2025 9:57 AM Jacketed